New York, session 2025-2026, S9611.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 3 of chapter 217 of the laws of 2015, amending the 2 education law relating to certified school psychologists and special 3 education services and programs for preschool children with handicapping 4 conditions, as amended by section 3 of part C of chapter 57 of the laws 5 of 2024, is amended to read as follows: 6 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately and shall be deemed to 7 have been in full force and effect on and after July 1, 2014, provided, 8 however that the provisions of this act shall expire and be deemed 9 repealed June 30, [2026] 2028. 10 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15402-01-6